test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_AAN_gt-norm.yaml
     k̲'íinaan+V+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE: k̲'íinaan
     k̲'íinaan+V+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: k̲'íinaan.ga
     k̲'íinaan+V+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k̲'íinaan
     k̲'íinaan+V+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k̲'íinaan.gang
     k̲'íinaan+V+DIRECT+PAST: k̲'íinaan.gan
     k̲'íinaan+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: k̲'íinaan.gaa
     k̲'íinaan+V+INDIRECT+PAST: k̲'íinaanaan
     k̲'íinaan+V+RELATIVE: k̲'íinaans
     k̲'íinaan+V+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: k̲'íinaanaas
     k̲'íinaan+V+NON_FACTIVE: k̲'íinaanang
     k̲'íinaan+V+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: k̲'íinaanaa.ang
     k̲'íinaan+V+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: k̲'íinaan.gang
     k̲'íinaan+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL: k̲'íinaan.ganggang
     k̲'íinaan+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: k̲'íinaan.gangang
     k̲'íinaan+V+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲'íinaan.giinii
     k̲'íinaan+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲'íinaanaangaa
     k̲'íinaan+V+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲'íinaanaangaan
     k̲'íinaan+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: k̲'íinaanäsaa
     k̲'íinaan+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: k̲'íinaanäs
     k̲'íinaan+V+SIMPLE+FUTURE: k̲'íinaanäsaang
     k̲'íinaan+V+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: k̲'íinaanäsga
     k̲'íinaan+V+RELATIVE+FUTURE: k̲'íinaanäsaas
     k̲'íinaan+V+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: k̲'íinaanäsaa.ang
     k̲'íinaan+V+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: k̲'íinaanang k̲asa'áa
     k̲'íinaan+V+NEAR+FUTURE: k̲'íinaanang k̲asa'áang
     k̲'íinaan+V+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: k̲'íinaanang k̲asaasdláa
     k̲'íinaan+V+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: k̲'íinaanang k̲asaasdláang
     k̲'íinaan+V+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: k̲'íinaan'uuj
     k̲'íinaan+V+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k̲'íinaan'uujang
     k̲'íinaan+V+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: k̲'íinaanäsaa'uujang
     k̲'íinaan+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: k̲'íinaan'us
     k̲'íinaan+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: k̲'íinaan'ujaa
     k̲'íinaan+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲'íinaan'uujaangaa
     k̲'íinaan+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: k̲'íinaanäsaa'us
     k̲'íinaan+V+CERTAIN+PRESENT: k̲'íinaan'ahlanggang
     k̲'íinaan+V+CERTAIN+PAST: k̲'íinaan'ahlanggan
     k̲'íinaan+V+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲'íinaan'ahlanggiinii
     k̲'íinaan+V+CERTAIN+FUTURE: k̲'íinaanäsaa'ahlans
     k̲'íinaan+V+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: k̲'íinaan'ahlans
     k̲'íinaan+V+INTENSIVE+PAST: k̲'íinaanaa'ahlang
     k̲'íinaan+V+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: k̲'íinaanaa'ahlanggaa
     k̲'íinaan+V+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: k̲'íinaanaa'ahlanggang
     k̲'íinaan+V+REFLEXIVE: k̲'íinaan'ahl
     k̲'íinaan+V+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: k̲'íinaanäseehl
     k̲'íinaan+V+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE: k̲'íinaan'uu
     k̲'íinaan+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: k̲'íinaan'waa
     k̲'íinaan+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k̲'íinaan'waa
     k̲'íinaan+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k̲'íinaan'waang
     k̲'íinaan+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST: k̲'íinaan'wägan
     k̲'íinaan+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: k̲'íinaan'aawaa
     k̲'íinaan+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST: k̲'íinaan'aawaan
     k̲'íinaan+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE: k̲'íinaan'waas
     k̲'íinaan+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: k̲'íinaan'aawaas
     k̲'íinaan+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE: k̲'íinaan'waa.ang
     k̲'íinaan+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: k̲'íinaan'aawaa.ang
     k̲'íinaan+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: k̲'íinaan.gang'waa
     k̲'íinaan+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL: k̲'íinaan.gang'waang
     k̲'íinaan+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: k̲'íinaan.gang'waa.ang
     k̲'íinaan+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲'íinaan'wägiinii
     k̲'íinaan+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲'íinaan'wägaangaa
     k̲'íinaan+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲'íinaan'wägaangaan
     k̲'íinaan+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: k̲'íinaan'waaäsaa
     k̲'íinaan+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: k̲'íinaan'waaäs
     k̲'íinaan+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE: k̲'íinaan'waaäsaang
     k̲'íinaan+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: k̲'íinaan'waaäsga
     k̲'íinaan+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+FUTURE: k̲'íinaan'waaäsaas
     k̲'íinaan+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: k̲'íinaan'waaäsaa.ang
     k̲'íinaan+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: k̲'íinaan'waa.ang k̲asa'áa
     k̲'íinaan+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NEAR+FUTURE: k̲'íinaan'waa.ang k̲asa'áang
     k̲'íinaan+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: k̲'íinaan'waa.ang k̲asaasdláa
     k̲'íinaan+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: k̲'íinaan'waa.ang k̲asaasdláang
     k̲'íinaan+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: k̲'íinaan'waa'uuj
     k̲'íinaan+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k̲'íinaan'waa'uujang
     k̲'íinaan+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: k̲'íinaan'waaäsaa'uujang
     k̲'íinaan+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: k̲'íinaan'waa'us
     k̲'íinaan+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: k̲'íinaan'waa'ujaa
     k̲'íinaan+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲'íinaan'waa'uujaangaa
     k̲'íinaan+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: k̲'íinaan'waaäsaa'us
     k̲'íinaan+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PRESENT: k̲'íinaan'waa'ahlanggang
     k̲'íinaan+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST: k̲'íinaan'waa'ahlanggan
     k̲'íinaan+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲'íinaan'waa'ahlanggiinii
     k̲'íinaan+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+FUTURE: k̲'íinaan'waaäsaa'ahlans
     k̲'íinaan+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: k̲'íinaan'waa'ahlans
     k̲'íinaan+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTENSIVE+PAST: k̲'íinaan'aawaa'ahlang
     k̲'íinaan+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: k̲'íinaan'aawaa'ahlanggaa
     k̲'íinaan+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: k̲'íinaan'aawaa'ahlanggang
     k̲'íinaan+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+REFLEXIVE: k̲'íinaan'waa'ahl
     k̲'íinaan+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: k̲'íinaan'waaäseehl
     k̲'íinaan+V+NEGATIVE+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE: k̲'íinaan'ang
     k̲'íinaan+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: k̲'íinaan'angga
     k̲'íinaan+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k̲'íinaan'ang
     k̲'íinaan+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k̲'íinaan'anggang
     k̲'íinaan+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST: k̲'íinaan'anggan
     k̲'íinaan+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: k̲'íinaan'aangaa
     k̲'íinaan+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST: k̲'íinaan'aangaan
     k̲'íinaan+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE: k̲'íinaan'ans
     k̲'íinaan+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: k̲'íinaan'aangaas
     k̲'íinaan+V+NEGATIVE+NON_FACTIVE: k̲'íinaan'angang
     k̲'íinaan+V+NEGATIVE+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: k̲'íinaan'aangaa.ang
     k̲'íinaan+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: k̲'íinaan'anggang
     k̲'íinaan+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: k̲'íinaan.gang'anggang
     k̲'íinaan+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: k̲'íinaan.gang'angang
     k̲'íinaan+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲'íinaan'anggiinii
     k̲'íinaan+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲'íinaan'anggaangaa
     k̲'íinaan+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲'íinaan'anggaangaan
     k̲'íinaan+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: k̲'íinaan'angäsaa
     k̲'íinaan+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: k̲'íinaan'angäs
     k̲'íinaan+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+FUTURE: k̲'íinaan'angäsaang
     k̲'íinaan+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: k̲'íinaan'angäsga
     k̲'íinaan+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+FUTURE: k̲'íinaan'angäsaas
     k̲'íinaan+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: k̲'íinaan'angäsaa.ang
     k̲'íinaan+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: k̲'íinaanang k̲asaa'áng
     k̲'íinaan+V+NEGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: k̲'íinaanang k̲asaa'ánggang
     k̲'íinaan+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: k̲'íinaanang k̲asaasdlä'áng
     k̲'íinaan+V+NEGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: k̲'íinaanang k̲asaasdlä'ánggang
     k̲'íinaan+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: k̲'íinaan'ang'uuj
     k̲'íinaan+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k̲'íinaan'ang'uujang
     k̲'íinaan+V+NEGATIVE+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: k̲'íinaan'angäsaa'uujang
     k̲'íinaan+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: k̲'íinaan'ang'us
     k̲'íinaan+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: k̲'íinaan'ang'ujaa
     k̲'íinaan+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲'íinaan'ang'uujaangaa
     k̲'íinaan+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: k̲'íinaan'angäsaa'us
     k̲'íinaan+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PRESENT: k̲'íinaan'aang'ahlanggang
     k̲'íinaan+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST: k̲'íinaan'aang'ahlanggan
     k̲'íinaan+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲'íinaan'aang'ahlanggiinii
     k̲'íinaan+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+FUTURE: k̲'íinaan'angäsaa'ahlans
     k̲'íinaan+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: k̲'íinaan'aang'ahlans
     k̲'íinaan+V+NEGATIVE+INTENSIVE+PAST: k̲'íinaan'aangaa'ahlang
     k̲'íinaan+V+NEGATIVE+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: k̲'íinaan'aangaa'ahlanggaa
     k̲'íinaan+V+NEGATIVE+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: k̲'íinaan'aangaa'ahlanggang
     k̲'íinaan+V+NEGATIVE+REFLEXIVE: k̲'íinaan'aang'ahl
     k̲'íinaan+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: k̲'íinaan'angäseehl
     k̲'íinaan+V+NEGATIVE+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE: k̲'íinaan'ang'uu
     k̲'íinaan+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: k̲'íinaan'ang'waa
     k̲'íinaan+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k̲'íinaan'ang'waa
     k̲'íinaan+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k̲'íinaan'ang'waang
     k̲'íinaan+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST: k̲'íinaan'ang'wägan
     k̲'íinaan+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: k̲'íinaan'ang'aawaa
     k̲'íinaan+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST: k̲'íinaan'ang'aawaan
     k̲'íinaan+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE: k̲'íinaan'ang'waas
     k̲'íinaan+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: k̲'íinaan'ang'aawaas
     k̲'íinaan+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE: k̲'íinaan'ang'waa.ang
     k̲'íinaan+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: k̲'íinaan'ang'aawaa.ang
     k̲'íinaan+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: k̲'íinaan.gang'ang'waa
     k̲'íinaan+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL: k̲'íinaan.gang'ang'waang
     k̲'íinaan+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: k̲'íinaan.gang'ang'waa.ang
     k̲'íinaan+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲'íinaan'ang'wägiinii
     k̲'íinaan+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲'íinaan'ang'wägaangaa
     k̲'íinaan+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲'íinaan'ang'wägaangaan
     k̲'íinaan+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: k̲'íinaan'ang'waaäsaa
     k̲'íinaan+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: k̲'íinaan'ang'waaäs
     k̲'íinaan+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE: k̲'íinaan'ang'waaäsaang
     k̲'íinaan+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: k̲'íinaan'ang'waaäsga
     k̲'íinaan+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+FUTURE: k̲'íinaan'ang'waaäsaas
     k̲'íinaan+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: k̲'íinaan'ang'waaäsaa.ang
     k̲'íinaan+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: k̲'íinaan'waa.ang k̲asaa'áng
     k̲'íinaan+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NEAR+FUTURE: k̲'íinaan'waa.ang k̲asaa'ánggang
     k̲'íinaan+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: k̲'íinaan'waa.ang k̲asaasdlä'áng
     k̲'íinaan+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: k̲'íinaan'waa.ang k̲asaasdlä'ánggang
     k̲'íinaan+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: k̲'íinaan'ang'waa'uuj
     k̲'íinaan+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k̲'íinaan'ang'waa'uujang
     k̲'íinaan+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: k̲'íinaan'ang'waaäsaa'uujang
     k̲'íinaan+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: k̲'íinaan'ang'waa'us
     k̲'íinaan+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: k̲'íinaan'ang'waa'ujaa
     k̲'íinaan+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲'íinaan'ang'waa'uujaangaa
     k̲'íinaan+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: k̲'íinaan'ang'waaäsaa'us
